src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
!! # Documenting the file for  *Meänkieli adjective morphology*
!! This file documents  the file *affixes/adjectives.lexc* for Meänkieli adjective morphology.

!! Most lexica here (*a1, a_e, ...*) add **+A**, and thereafter redirect to the corresponding **x1, x_e, ...** lexicon in `affixes/nouns.lexc` for case inflection.
!! In addition, each lexicon also points to comparative and superlative sublexica.

!! * ax: unclassified, pointing to a1
!! * a1: for 2-syll adjectives (ie adj where a/ä>e in comp); hullu:hullu (pointing to x1)
!! * a_long: for 4-syll adjectives (ie NOT AE in Comp); huomattava:huomattava
!! * a1_ta: a1 plus plural partitive -ta; paksuita
!! * a1_aa: even syll adj ending with -aa; vanhaa, kuumaa
!! * a1_kova: only kova (like a1 plus kovviiman, kovviin, kovviimphaan) 
!! * a1_hyva: only hyvä (parempi paremmin)
!! * a1_pitka: only pitkä (pitempi etc)
!! * a_e: for stems ending w -e: viime:viime, terve:terve
!! * a3: for 3-syll stems sopiva:sopiva
!! * a3_VV: 3-syll stems with two (different) vowels; komea:komea
!! * a4: continuation lexica for a5-type
!! * a5_nuori: nuori:nuore (like kieli>kieltä; pointing to x5)
!! * a5_uusi: uusi:uus (+tosi, täysi)
!! * a5_pieni: pieni:pien; special variants with -ii- in superlative
!! * a5_auki: auki:auk2 !CHECK
!! * a5_even: even-syll i-ending of troppi-type; ratikaali (points to n5_troppi_even)
!! * a5_odd: odd-syll i-ending of troppi-type; privaatti (points to n5_troppi_odd)
!! * a5_fiini: odd/even – normaali, fiini etc; plural forms with -i-
!! * anen_odd: arvolinen:arvoli, pointing to xnen
!! * anen_even tikitaalinen:tikitaali, pointing to x3nen 
!! * aas: utelias:utelia 
!! * a_ias: hias:hita (puhelias:puhelia) 
!! * a_as: continuation lexica for a_ias, a_has
!! * a_has: puhas:puhta 
!! * a_suuri: suuri:suur
!! * a_ton: naimaton:naimat
!! * a_ime: for avon>avome-type like avon:avo/avoin:avoi
!! * a_ma: for vasen>vasema-; lähin:lähi 


!! ## Unassigned
LEXICON ax
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** pointing to a1; for adjectives that have not been classified
a1 ; ! ax

!! ## Regular lexica

LEXICON a1 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** adding **+A** and sending to **x1**, and to *3comp, 3sup*.
+A: x1 ; 
+A+Sg+Nom: R ; 
+A+Sg+Gen:^WG%>n R ;  
+A+Pl+Gen:^WG^IDEL%>i2e n_PxK ; !  also kovien
+A+Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:^HMETA%>^Vi2hi n_PxK ; !Check should this be Err/Orth?
+A+Comp:^AE 3comp ; 
+A+Comp+Pl+Gen:^AE%>mpien K ;
+A+Comp+Sg+Nom:^AE^WG%>mpi K ;
+A+Superl: 3sup ; 

LEXICON a1_long 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for four syllable adjectives (ie not AE in Comp); huomattava:huomattava
+A: x1 ; 
+A+Sg+Nom: R ; 
+A+Sg+Gen:^WG%>n R ;  
+A+Pl+Gen:^WG^IDEL%>i2e n_PxK ;
+A+Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:^HMETA%>^Vi2hi n_PxK ; !Check should this be Err/Orth?
+A+Comp: 3comp ;  
+A+Comp+Pl+Gen:%>mpien K ;
+A+Comp+Sg+Nom:^WG%>mpi K ; 
+A+Superl: 3sup ; 

LEXICON a1_ta 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** vanhaa !TODO!
a1 ;
+A+Pl+Par:^WG^IDEL%>i2ta PxK ; !  also paksuita TODO: dela upp, vilka ska ha -ta-variant?

LEXICON a1_aa
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** vanhaa !TODO! vanhaa:vanhaa a1_aa ;  
+A+Sg+Nom:a R ; 
+A+Sg+Nom:a K ;
+A+Sg+Gen:a%> n_PxK ; 
+A+Sg+Par:a%>t^A PxK ; 
+A+Sg+Ill:a%>shee n_PxK ; 
+A+Sg+Ine:a%>ss^A PxK ;    
+A+Sg+Ela:a%>st^A PxK ;     
+A+Sg+All:a%>le PxxK ;      
+A+Sg+Ade:a%>l^A PxK ;      
+A+Sg+Abl:a%>lt^A PxK ;      
+A+Sg+Tra:a TRA ;       
+A+Sg+Ess:a%>n^A PxK ;       
+A+Sg+Abe:a%>tt^A PxK ;    
+A+Sg+All:a%>le K ; 
+A+Sg+Ade:a%>l^A K ; 

+A+Pl+Nom:a%> t_PxK ;
+A+Pl+Gen:%>i2tte n_PxK ; !vanhoitten vanhaitten nu
+A+Pl+Gen:%>i2e n_PxK ; !vanhojen vanhaien nu
+A+Pl+Par:%>i2^A PxK ; 
+A+Pl+Par:%>i2t^A PxK ; 
+A+Pl+Ill:^HMETA%>h^Vi2 n_PxK ;  ! vanhoin  EG fel
+A+Pl+Ill:^HMETA%>hh^Vi2 n_PxK ;  ! vanhhoin  FUNKAR EJ?
+A+Pl+Ill:%>i2hi n_PxK ;  ! vanhoihin 
+A+Pl+Ine:%>i2ss^A PxK ; !vanhoissa osv
+A+Pl+Ela:%>i2st^A PxK ;
+A+Pl+All:%>i2le PxxK ;
+A+Pl+Ade:%>i2l^A PxK ;
+A+Pl+Abl:%>i2lt^A PxK ;
+A+Pl+Tra:%>i2 TRA ;
+A+Pl+Ess:%>i2n^A PxK ; 
+A+Pl+Abe:%>i2tt^A PxK ;
+A+Comp:^AEe 3comp ; 
+A+Comp+Sg+Nom:^AEe^WG%>mpi K ;
+A+Comp+Pl+Gen:^AEempi2e n_PxK ;

+A+Superl+Sg+Nom:%>i5i5n # ; 
+A+Superl+Sg+Ess:%>i5i5mp^Ann^A K ; !
+A+Superl+Sg+All:%>i5i5m^Alle K ; !
+A+Superl+Sg+Ade:%>i5i5m^All^A K ; !
+A+Superl+Sg+Gen:%>i5i5m^An K ; 
+A+Superl+Sg+Par:%>i5i5mp^A^A K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Tra:%>i5i5m^Aksi K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ill:%>i5i5mph^A^An K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ine:%>i5i5m^Ass^A K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ela:%>i5i5m^Ast^A K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Abl:%>i5i5m^Alt^A K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Nom:%>i5i5m^At # ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Gen:%>i5i5mitten K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Gen:%>i5i5mitten K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Par:%>i5i5mpi^A K ; !vanhiimpia
+A+Superl+Pl+Tra:%>i5i5miksi K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ill:%>i5i5mphiin K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ine:%>i5i5miss^A K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ela:%>i5i5mist^A K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Abl:%>i5i5milt^A K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ess:%>i5i5mpinn^A K ; !
+A+Superl+Pl+All:%>i5i5mille K ; !
+A+Superl+Pl+Ade:%>i5i5mill^A K ; !


LEXICON a1_kova 
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** Like a1 but: also kovviiman, kovviin, kovviimphaan
+A: x1 ; 
+A+Sg+Nom: R ; 
+A+Sg+Gen:^WG%>n R ;  
+A+Pl+Gen:^WG^IDEL%>i2e n_PxK ; !  also kovien
+A+Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:^HMETA%>^Vi2hi n_PxK ; !Check should this be Err/Orth?
+A+Comp:^AE 3comp ; 
+A+Comp+Sg+Nom:^AE^WG%>mpi K ;
+A+Comp+Pl+Gen:^AE%>mpi5en K ;
+A+Superl: 3sup ; 
+A+Superl:%>i5 3sup ; 
+A+Superl+Pl+Gen:%>i5%>i5mpien K ;

LEXICON a1_vanha
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for hyvä
a1 ;
+A+Sg+Ill:^HMETA%>hh^A^A n_PxK ; !vanhhaan
+A+Pl+Ill:^HMETA%>hhoi2 n_PxK ; !vanhhoin 
+A+Pl+Par:^HMETA%>h^Vi2t^A PxK ; !vanhhaan
+A+Pl+Ill:^HMETA%>hoi2shii n_PxK ; ! 
+A+Pl+Ill:^HMETA%>hoi2hi n_PxK ; !vanhhoin K
+A+Superl+Sg+Nom:^WG%>i5i n_PxK ;    !vanhiin ^WG%>i5n K ; 
+A+Superl+Pl+Gen:^HMETA%>himpien PxK ;


LEXICON a1_hyva
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for hyvä
+A:hyvä x1 ; 
+A+Sg+Nom:hyvä R ; 
+A+Sg+Gen:hyvän R ;  
+A+Pl+Gen:hyvien K ;
+A+Comp:pare 3comp ; 
+A+Comp+Sg+Nom:pare^WG%>mpi K ;
+A+Comp+Pl+Gen:parempien K ;
!!+A+Superl:para 3sup ; 
+A+Superl+Sg+Nom:paras K ; 
+A+Superl+Sg+Gen:par%>haan K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Gen:par%>hhaan K ; !CHECK more of this type?
+A+Superl+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:par%>hain K ; !EK?
+A+Superl+Sg+Par:par%>asta K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ill:par%>haasheen K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ill:par%>hhaasheen K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ine:par%>haassa K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ela:par%>haasta K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Abl:par%>haalta K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+All:par%>haale K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ade:par%>haala K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Ess:par%>haana K ;
+A+Superl+Sg+Tra:par%>haaksi K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Nom:par%>haat K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Gen:par%>haitten K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Par:par%>haita K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Tra:par%>haiksi K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ill:par%>haishiin K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ine:par%>haissa K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ela:par%>haista K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+All:par%>haile K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ade:par%>haila K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Abl:par%>hailta K ;
+A+Superl+Pl+Ess:par%>haina K ;
