src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON AdjectiveRoot !!≈ @CODE@
kuiva a1 ; 
paksu a1 ;
vanha:vanha a1_vanha ;
vanhaa:vanha a1_aa ;  
ikivanhaa:ikivanha a1_aa ;
vinhaa:vinha a1_aa ;
vajaa:vaja a1_aa ;
kuumaa:kuuma a1_aa ;
vapaa:vapa a1_aa ;
paha:paha a1 ;
laiha:laiha a1 ;
viha:viha a1 ;
ikivanha:iki#vanha a1_vanha ;
turha:turha a1 ;
lauha:lauha a1 ;
laaja:laaja a1 ;
taaja:taaja a1 ;
hongankolistaja:hongan#kolistaja a1_long ;
kalja:kalja a1 ;
orja:orja a1 ;
hurja:hurja a1 ;
kurja:kurja a1 ;
nurja:nurja a1 ;
luja:luja a1 ;
sormiluja:sormiluja a1 ;
laaka:laaka a1 ;
raaka:raaka a1 ;
puoliraaka:puoli#raaka a1 ;
vaka:vaka a1 ;
viuhka:viuhka a1 ;
pitkähoikka:pitkä#hoikka a1 ;
molkka:molkka a1 ;
tarkka:tarkka a1 ;
niukka:niukka a1 ;
tiukka:tiukka a1 ;
arka:arka a1 ;
laiska:laiska a1 ;
nuoska:nuoska a1 ;
kitka:kitka a1 ;
tummanliila:tumman#liila a1 ;
lama:lama a1 ;
kumma:kumma a1 ;
keskitumma:keski#tumma a1 ;
vuotheenoma:vuotheen#oma a1 ;
varma:varma a1 ;
epävarma:epä#varma a1 ;
kuuma:kuuma a1 ;
tulikuuma:tuli#kuuma a1 ;
kriina:kriina a1 ;
vapa:vapa a1 ;
vihhaasuopa:vihhaa#suopa a1 ;
hupa:hupa a1 ;
piikkisuora:piikki#suora a1 ;
ekstra:ekstra a1 ;
nopsa:nopsa a1 ;
musta:musta a1 ;
nokimusta:noki#musta a1 ;
sinimusta:sini#musta a1 ;
öljymusta:öljy#musta a1 ;
haava:haava a1 ;
huomattava:huomattava a1_long ;
naurettava:naurettava a1_long ;
maksettava:maksettava a1_long ;
luotettava:luotettava a1_long ;
pääleluotettava:pääle#luotettava a1_long ;
mainittava:mainittava a1_long ;
inhottava:inhottava a1_long ;
ammottava:ammottava a1_long ;
korvaalumheuttava:korvaa#lumheuttava a1_long ;
korvialumheuttava:korvia#lumheuttava a1_long ;
tassuttava:tassuttava a1_long ;
vaihteleva:vaihteleva a1_long ;
kahiseva:kahiseva a1_long ;
kaliseva:kaliseva a1_long ;
vapiseva:vapiseva a1_long ;
vaiva:vaiva a1 ;
loiva:loiva a1 ;
hyvinvoiva:hyvin#voiva a1 ;
rutikuiva:ruti#kuiva a1 ;
kova:kova a1_kova ;
pruunikova:pruuni#kova a1_kova ;
kivikova:kivi#kova a1_kova ;
sarvikova:sarvi#kova a1_kova ;
kivenkova:kiven#kova a1_kova ;
tyköistuva:tyköistuva a1_long ;
tullifrii:tulli#frii ax ;
halki:halki ax ;
murski:murski ax ;
vili:vili ax ;
viimi:viimi ax ;
alempi:alempi ax ;
ylheisempi:ylheisempi ax ;
hauri:hauri ax ;
flaati:flaat2i ax ;
siisti:siisti ax ;
kroui:kroui ax ;
lujemphaan:lujemphaan ax ;
hapan:hapan ax ;
avoaukein:avoaukein ax ;
värstiin:värstiin ax ;
ylöspäin:ylöspäin ax ;
maho:maho ax ;
autio:autio ax ;
raanakko:raanakko ax ;
ummikko:ummikko a1_ta ;
raajarikko:raajarikko ax ;
suukko:suukko ax ;
kaalo:kaalo ax ;
nolo:nolo ax ;
kiero:kiero ax ;
melto:melto ax ;
ontto:ontto ax ;
puolivalmis:puolivalmis ax ;
miehekäs:miehekäs ax ;
tyvikäs:tyvikäs ax ;
vastapoikinut:vastapoikinut ax ;
kalju:kalju ax ;
plaisku:plaisku ax ;
reilu:reilu a1 ;
hapanu:hapanu ax ;
läpioppinu:läpioppinu ax ;
huolestunnu:huolestunnu ax ;
luiru:luiru ax ;
testosteroninpaksu:testosteronin#paksu a1_ta ;
paksu:paksu a1_ta ;
kilsu:kilsu ax ;
sahattu:sahattu a1_ta ;
harmaaksihakattu:harmaaksihakattu a1_ta ;
hyvinhakattu:hyvinhakattu a1_ta ;
paikattu:paikattu a1_ta ;
irtileikattu:irtileikattu a1_ta ;
pilkattu:pilkattu a1_ta ;
viskattu:viskattu a1_ta ;
maalattu:maalattu a1_ta ;
paperhiinmaalattu:paperhiinmaalattu a1_ta ;
papehriinmaalattu:papehriinmaalattu a1_ta ;
ulkokullattu:ulkokullattu a1_ta ;
rikkinaulattu:rikkinaulattu a1_ta ;
puuhunnaulattu:puuhunnaulattu a1_ta ;
hyvinkammattu:hyvinkammattu a1_ta ;
liipattu:liipattu a1_ta ;
kovaksipumpattu:kovaksipumpattu a1_ta ;
täythöönpumpattu:täythöönpumpattu a1_ta ;
ylöspumpattu:ylöspumpattu a1_ta ;
ympattu:ympattu a1_ta ;
teprimeerattu:teprimeerattu a1_ta ;
eksamineerattu:eksamineerattu a1_ta ;
impuneerattu:impuneerattu a1_ta ;
stasuneerattu:stasuneerattu a1_ta ;
kaseerattu:kaseerattu a1_ta ;
alkoholiseerattu:alkoholiseerattu a1_ta ;
fikseerattu:fikseerattu a1_ta ;
kiinitarrattu:kiinitarrattu a1_ta ;
passattu:passattu a1_ta ;
väärintavattu:väärintavattu a1_ta ;
poljettu:poljettu a1_ta ;
vinhoonpoljettu:vinhoonpoljettu a1_ta ;
suljettu:suljettu a1_ta ;
sisälesuljettu:sisälesuljettu a1_ta ;
vastarakennettu:vastarakennettu a1_ta ;
tunnettu:tunnettu a1_ta ;
nuijalatapettu:nuijalatapettu a1_ta ;
kasvatettu:kasvatettu a1_ta ;
opetettu:opetettu a1_ta ;
vasthaanotettu:vasthaanotettu a1_ta ;
ylösotettu:ylösotettu a1_ta ;
luotettu:luotettu a1_ta ;
pääleluotettu:pääleluotettu a1_ta ;
kastettu:kastettu a1_ta ;
ahistettu:ahistettu a1_ta ;
ostettu:ostettu a1_ta ;
yliarvostettu:yliarvostettu a1_ta ;
mukhaanluettu:mukhaanluettu a1_ta ;
salvettu:salvettu a1_ta ;
kuolemhaantuomittu:kuolemhaantuomittu a1_ta ;
vasittu:vasittu a1_ta ;
ruankranttu:ruankranttu ax ;
kirottu:kirottu a1_ta ;
läpiammuttu:läpiammuttu a1_ta ;
tuttu:tuttu a1_ta ;
menny:menny ax ;
jännittynny:jännittynny ax ;
puolimääny:puolimääny ax ;
vastaniitetty:vastaniitetty ax ;
pölätty:pölätty ax ;
löyhä:löyhä ax ;
jyrkkä:jyrkkä ax ;
likomärkä:likomärkä ax ;
vikkelä:vikkelä ax ;
pyyrösilmä:pyyrösilmä ax ;
tietämättömännä:tietämättömännä ax ;
näpperä:näpperä ax ;
nöyrä:nöyrä ax ;
ylikypsä:ylikypsä ax ;
ryöttä:ryöttä ax ;
eppäilevä:eppäilevä ax ;
selvä:selvä a1 ;
päivänselvä:päivän#selvä a1 ;
hyvä: a1_hyva ;
ittehyvä:itte# a1_hyva ;
tosihyvä:tosi# a1_hyva ;
vuotheenhyvä:vuotheen# a1_hyva ;
sisälelämpiävä:sisälelämpiävä ax ;
tykättävä:tykättävä ax ;
pölättää:pölättää ax ;
kömö:kömö ax ;
pehmeä:pehmeä ax ;
suosittu:suosittu a1_ta ;
